Utah statutes.
31A-40-307.   Voluntary surrender of professional employer organization license.

(1)  When a professional employer organization wants to voluntarily surrender its professional employer organization license, the professional employer organization shall:

(a)  notify in writing each coemployer regarding the impending loss of the following provided under the professional employer agreement:

(i)  workers' compensation insurance coverage;

(ii)  health care benefits, if a coemployers' employee welfare plan includes fully insured or partially insured health insurance benefits; and

(iii)  any other insurance benefit provided to coemployers by the professional employer organization; and

(b)  submit a letter of intent to voluntarily surrender the license to the commissioner:

(i)  after providing the notice to coemployers under Subsection (1)(a); and

(ii)  not less than 45 days before the day on which the professional employer organization surrenders its professional employer organization license.

(2)  The letter of intent to voluntarily surrender a professional employer organization license shall include the following:

(a)  the reason the professional employer organization license is being surrendered;

(b)  a discussion of each process or plan to handle the obligations to coemployers and employees;

(c)  a list of coemployers as of the date of the letter;

(d)  a copy of the notice sent to the coemployers under Subsection (1)(a);

(e)  certification that the professional employer organization has notified the coemployers located in Utah of the professional employer organization's intent to cease doing business in Utah; and

(f)  the signature of the professional employer organization's chief executive officer or controlling individual.

